Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 735.530 to
735.552.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “pharmacy services administrative
organization” means an entity that:
(a) Contracts with a pharmacy to act as the pharmacy’s  agent with respect to matters
involving a pharmacy benefit manager, third party payer or  other entity, including by nego-
tiating, executing or administering contracts with the pharmacy benefit manager, third party
payer or other entity; and
(b) Provides administrative services to pharmacies.
(2) Upon the request of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services, a pharmacy
benefit manager shall submit to the department  the pharmacy benefit manager’s contracts
and amendments to contracts with pharmacies  or pharmacy services administrative organ-
izations and the pharmacy benefit manager’s provider manuals.
(3) Contracts, contract amendments and provider manuals submitted to the  department
under this section are exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 735.530 is amended to read:
735.530. As used in ORS 735.530 to 735.552:
(1) “Claim” means a request from a pharmacy or pharmacist to be reimbursed for the  cost of
filling or refilling a prescription for a drug or for providing a medical supply or service.
(2) “Enrollee” means an individual who has enrolled for coverage in a health benefit plan  for
which a pharmacy benefit manager has contracted with  the insurer to reimburse claims submitted
by pharmacies or pharmacists for the costs of drugs prescribed for the individual.
(3) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(4) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.106.
(5) “Long term care pharmacy” means a pharmacy for which the primary  business is to serve
a:
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 1
(a) Licensed long term care facility, as defined in ORS 442.015;
(b) Licensed residential facility, as defined in ORS 443.400; or
(c) Licensed adult foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705.
(6) “Mail  order pharmacy” means a pharmacy for which the primary business is to receive pre-
scriptions by mail, telephone or electronic transmission and  dispense drugs to patients through the
use of the United States Postal Service, a package delivery service or home delivery.
(7) “Network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that contracts with a pharmacy benefit manager.
(8) “Pharmacist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(9) “Pharmacy” includes:
(a) A pharmacy as defined in ORS 689.005;
(b) A long term care pharmacy; and
(c) An entity that provides or oversees administrative services for two or more pharmacies.
(10) “Pharmacy benefit” means the payment for or reimbursement of  an enrollee’s cost for pre-
scription drugs.
(11)(a) “Pharmacy benefit manager” means a person that contracts with pharmacies  on behalf
of [ an insurer offering a health benefit plan, a  third party administrator ] an insurer, coordinated
care organizations as  defined in ORS 414.025 or the Oregon Prescription Drug Program estab-
lished in ORS 414.312 to:
(A) Process claims for prescription drugs  or medical supplies or provide retail network man-
agement for pharmacies or pharmacists;
(B) Pay pharmacies or pharmacists for prescription drugs or medical supplies; [ or]
(C) Negotiate rebates , discounts or other  financial incentives or arrangements  with man-
ufacturers for drugs paid for or procured as described in this paragraph ;
(D) Receive payments for pharmacy services;
(E) Disburse or distribute rebates;
(F) Manage or participate in incentive programs or arrangements  with manufacturers
of drugs;
(G) Negotiate or enter into contracts with pharmacies;
(H) Develop formularies;
(I) Design pharmacy benefit programs; or
(J) Advertise or promote pharmacy services .
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” does not include a health care  service contractor as defined in
ORS 750.005.
(12) “Pharmacy services” means the provision of products, goods or services in the
course of the practice of pharmacy.
[(12)] (13) “Specialty drug” means a drug that:
(a) Is subject to restricted distribution by the United States Food and Drug Administration; or
(b) Requires special handling, provider coordination  or patient education that cannot be pro-
vided by a retail pharmacy.
[(13)] (14) “Specialty pharmacy” means a pharmacy capable of meeting  the requirements appli-
cable to specialty drugs.
[(14)] (15) “Third party administrator” means a person licensed under ORS 744.702.
[(15)] (16) “340B pharmacy” means a  pharmacy that is authorized to purchase drugs at a dis-
count under 42 U.S.C. 256b.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 735.532 is amended to read:
735.532. [(1) To conduct business in this state, a pharmacy benefit manager must register with the
Department of Consumer and Business Services and annually renew the registration. ]
[(2) To register under this section, a pharmacy benefit manager must: ]
(1) A person may not transact business or purport to transact business in this state as
a pharmacy benefit manager unless the person has a license to transact  business as a
pharmacy benefit manager issued by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(2) To obtain a license under this section, a person must:
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 2
(a) Submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(b) Pay a [ registration] fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(3) A license  to transact business as a pharmacy benefit manager must be renewed every
12 months.  To renew a [ registration] license  under this [ section] subsection , a pharmacy benefit
manager must pay a renewal fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall deposit all moneys collected under this section into  the Consumer and
Business Services Fund created in ORS 705.145.
(5) Any fee adopted by the department under this section  must be [ based on ] sufficient to pay
the department’s reasonable costs in administering ORS 735.530 to 735.552.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 735.533 is amended to read:
735.533. (1) In accordance with ORS chapter 183, the Department  of Consumer and Business
Services may deny an application for [ registration] a license to transact business  as  a pharmacy
benefit manager or  deny an application for renewal of a [ registration] license to transact  business
as a pharmacy benefit manager,  and may suspend or revoke a [ registration] a license to transact
business as a pharmacy benefit manager, if the department finds that an applicant or [ registrant]
licensee:
(a) Falsified an application for [ registration] a license  or for  the renewal of a [ registration] li-
cense or engaged in any dishonest act in relation to the application;
(b) Engaged in dishonesty,  fraud or gross negligence in the conduct of business as a pharmacy
benefit manager;
(c) Engaged in conduct that  resulted in a conviction of a felony under the laws of any state or
of the United States, to the extent that such conduct may be considered under ORS 670.280;
(d) Was convicted under the laws of any state or of the  United States of any crime of which an
essential element is dishonesty or fraud;
(e) Had a certificate of authority or authority to conduct business as a pharmacy benefit man-
ager denied, revoked or suspended in another state;
(f) Failed to pay a civil penalty imposed by final order of the department or  to comply with the
terms of suspension set by the department;
(g) Failed to meet the terms of a  consent decree approved by a court of competent jurisdiction
in this state, or a consent order made between the department and the pharmacy benefit manager;
(h) Refused to be examined or to produce accounts, records or  files for examination, including
the refusal by any officer of the applicant or [ registrant] licensee to give information with  respect
to the affairs of the pharmacy  benefit manager, or refused to perform any other legal obligation with
respect to an examination by the department; or
(i) Violated any  [ rule or order of the department or any ] provision of the Insurance Code , any
rule adopted by the department  pursuant to the Insurance Code or any order of the depart-
ment.
(2) The department may prescribe by rule  a procedure by which a pharmacy or an entity acting
on behalf of a pharmacy may file a complaint with the  department alleging that a pharmacy benefit
manager has engaged in conduct [ described in this section ] in violation of ORS 735.530 to 735.552 .
The department may restrict the right of a pharmacy or entity to file a complaint only  to the extent
necessary to prevent abuse of the complaint process.
SECTION 6.  ORS 735.534 is amended to read:
735.534. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Generally available for purchase” means a drug is available for purchase in this state
by a pharmacy from a national or  regional wholesaler at the time a claim for reimbursement is
submitted by a network pharmacy.
(B) A drug is not “generally available for purchase” if the drug:
(i) May be dispensed only in a hospital or inpatient care facility;
(ii) Is unavailable due to a shortage of the product or an ingredient;
(iii) Is available to  a pharmacy at a price that is at or below the maximum allowable cost only
if purchased in substantial quantities that are inconsistent with the business needs of a pharmacy;
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 3
(iv) Is sold at a discount due to a short expiration date on the drug; or
(v) Is the subject of an active or pending recall.
(b) “List” means the list of drugs for which maximum allowable costs have been established.
(c) “Maximum allowable cost” means the maximum amount that a pharmacy benefit manager
will reimburse a pharmacy for the cost of a drug.
(d) “Multiple source drug” means a therapeutically equivalent drug  that is available from at
least two manufacturers.
(e) “Therapeutically equivalent” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.515.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager [ registered ] licensed under ORS 735.532:
(a) May not place a drug on a list unless there are at least two multiple source drugs, or at least
one generic drug generally available for purchase.
(b) Shall ensure that all drugs on a list are generally available for purchase.
(c) Shall ensure that no drug on a list is obsolete.
(d) Shall make available to each network pharmacy at  the beginning of the term of a contract,
and upon renewal of  a contract, the specific authoritative industry sources, other than proprietary
sources, the pharmacy benefit manager uses  to determine the maximum allowable cost set by the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(e) Shall make a list available to a network pharmacy upon request in a format that:
(A) Is electronic;
(B) Is computer accessible and searchable;
(C) Identifies all drugs for which maximum allowable costs have been established; and
(D) For each drug specifies:
(i) The national drug code; and
(ii) The maximum allowable cost.
(f) Shall update each list maintained by the pharmacy benefit manager every seven business days
and make the updated  lists, including all changes in the price of drugs, available to network phar-
macies in the format described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(g) Shall ensure that dispensing fees are not included in the calculation of  maximum allowable
cost.
(h) May not reimburse a 340B pharmacy differently than any other  network pharmacy based on
its status as a 340B pharmacy.
(i) Shall comply with the provisions of ORS 743A.062.
[(i)] (j)  May not retroactively deny or reduce payment  on a claim for reimbursement of the cost
of services after the claim has been adjudicated by the pharmacy benefit manager unless the:
(A) Adjudicated claim was submitted fraudulently;
(B) Pharmacy benefit manager’s payment on the adjudicated claim was incorrect because the
pharmacy had already been paid for the services;
(C) Services were improperly rendered by the  pharmacy  in violation of state or federal law ;
or
[(D) Pharmacy agrees to the denial or reduction prior to the pharmacy benefit manager  notifying
the pharmacy that the claim has been denied or reduced; or ]
[(E)] (D)  [ The] Payment was incorrect due to an error that the pharmacy and  pharmacy benefit
manager agree was a clerical error.
[(j)] (k)  May not impose a fee on a pharmacy after the point of sale.
[(k)] (L)  Shall provide notice to a pharmacy of any claim for reimbursement of the cost  of a
prescription drug that is denied or  reduced. The notice shall identify the specific disaggregated
claim that was denied or reduced  and a detailed explanation for why the specific claim was denied
or reduced.
(3) Subsection [ (2)(i)] (2)(j) of this section may not be construed to  limit pharmacy claim audits
under ORS 735.540 to 735.552.
(4) A pharmacy benefit manager must establish a  process by which a network pharmacy may
appeal its reimbursement for a drug subject to  maximum allowable cost pricing. A network phar-
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 4
macy may appeal a maximum allowable cost if the reimbursement for  the drug is less than the net
amount that the network pharmacy paid to the supplier of the drug.  The process must allow a net-
work pharmacy a period of no less than 60 days after  a claim is reimbursed in which to file the
appeal. An  appeal requested under this section must be completed within 30 calendar days of the
pharmacy making the claim for which appeal has been requested.
(5) A pharmacy benefit manager shall allow a network  pharmacy to submit the documentation
in support of its appeal on paper or electronically and may not:
(a) Refuse to accept an appeal submitted by a person authorized to act on behalf of the network
pharmacy;
(b) Refuse to adjudicate  an appeal for the reason that the appeal is submitted along with other
claims that are denied; or
(c) Impose requirements or establish procedures that have the  effect of unduly obstructing or
delaying an appeal.
(6) A pharmacy benefit manager must provide as part of the appeals process  established under
subsection (4) of this section:
(a) A telephone number at which a network pharmacy may contact the pharmacy benefit  man-
ager and speak with an individual who is responsible for processing appeals;
(b) A final response to an appeal of [ a maximum allowable cost ] the reimbursement for a  drug
within seven business days; and
(c) If the appeal is denied, the reason for the denial and the national  drug code of a drug that
may be purchased by similarly situated pharmacies at a price that is equal  to or less than the
maximum allowable cost.
(7)(a) If an appeal is upheld under this section, the pharmacy benefit manager shall:
(A) Make an adjustment for the  pharmacy that requested the appeal from the date of initial
adjudication forward; and
(B) Allow the pharmacy to reverse the claim and resubmit  an adjusted claim without any addi-
tional charges.
(b) If the request for an adjustment has come from a critical access pharmacy, as defined by the
Oregon Health Authority by rule for purposes related  to the Oregon Prescription Drug Program, the
adjustment approved under paragraph (a)  of this subsection shall apply only to critical access
pharmacies.
[(8) This section does not apply to the state medical assistance program. ]
(8) A pharmacy may  file a complaint with the Department of Consumer and Business
Services to contest a  finding of a pharmacy benefit manager in response to an appeal under
subsection (4) of this section or a pharmacy benefit manager’s failure to  comply with the
provisions of this section.
(9) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules  to carry out the pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 735.536 is amended to read:
735.536. (1) As  used in this section, “out-of-pocket cost” means the amount paid by an enrollee
under the enrollee’s coverage, including deductibles, copayments, coinsurance  or other expenses as
prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services by rule.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager [ registered ] licensed under ORS 735.532:
(a) May not require a prescription to be filled or refilled by a mail  order pharmacy as a condi-
tion for reimbursing the cost of the drug.
(b) Except as provided in  paragraph (c) of this subsection, may require a prescription for a
specialty drug to be filled or refilled at a specialty pharmacy  as a condition for the reimbursement
of the cost of a drug.
(c) Shall reimburse the cost of  a specialty drug that is filled or refilled at a network pharmacy
that is a long term care pharmacy.
(d)(A) Shall allow a network pharmacy  to mail, ship or deliver prescription drugs to its patients
as an ancillary service.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 5
(B) Is not required to reimburse a delivery fee charged by  a pharmacy for a delivery described
in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph unless the fee is specified  in the contract between the phar-
macy benefit manager and the pharmacy.
(e) May not require a patient signature as proof of delivery of a mailed or shipped prescription
drug if the network pharmacy:
(A)(i) Maintains a mailing or shipping log signed by a representative of the pharmacy; or
(ii) Maintains each notification of delivery provided by the  United States Postal Service or a
package delivery service; and
(B) Is responsible for the cost of mailing, shipping or delivering a replacement for a  drug that
was mailed or shipped but not received by the enrollee.
(f) May not penalize a network  pharmacy  by imposing charges or fees, requiring contract
amendments, canceling or terminating contracts or demanding  recoupment or otherwise
retaliate against a network pharmacy  for : [ or otherwise directly or indirectly prevent a network
pharmacy from]
(A) Informing an enrollee of the difference between the  out-of-pocket cost to the enrollee to
purchase a prescription drug using  the enrollee’s pharmacy benefit and the pharmacy’s usual and
customary charge for the prescription drug[ .];
(B) Filing an appeal;
(C) Filing a complaint against the pharmacy benefit manager with the  Department of
Consumer and Business Services;
(D) Engaging in the legislative process; or
(E) Challenging the pharmacy benefit manager’s practices or agreements.
(g) May not charge a fee to a  pharmacy for submitting claims or for the adjudication of
claims.
(3) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services may adopt rules to carry out the pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 735.537 is amended to read:
735.537. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Administrative fee” means the  administrative and service fees charged by pharmacy
benefit managers to manufacturers and  carriers that are typically a percentage of the list
price of a prescription drug.
[(a)] (b) “Carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
[(b)] (c)  “Manufacturer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.689.
[(c)] (d) “Prescription drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.689.
(e) “Spread pricing” means the difference between the amount an insurer pays a  phar-
macy benefit manager and the amount that the pharmacy benefit  manager reimburses a
pharmacy for a beneficiary’s prescription.
(2) Not later than June 1 of each calendar  year, a pharmacy benefit manager [ registered ] li-
censed under ORS 735.532 shall file  a report with the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices. The report must contain, for the immediately preceding calendar year[ ,]:
(a) The aggregated dollar amount of rebates, fees, price  protection payments and any other
payments the pharmacy benefit manager received from manufacturers:
[(a)] (A)  Related  to managing the pharmacy benefits for carriers issuing health benefit plans in
this state; and
[(b)] (B)  That were:
[(A)] (i) Passed on to carriers issuing health benefit  plans in this state or enrollees at the point
of sale of a prescription drug in this state; or
[(B)] (ii) Retained as revenue by the pharmacy benefit manager.
(b) The total dispensing fees paid to the pharmacy benefit manager and to pharmacies.
(c) The total administrative fees obtained and retained from manufacturers and carriers.
(d) Moneys obtained through spread pricing, pay-for-performance or similar means.
(3) The report described in subsection (2) of this section may not disclose:
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 6
(a) The identity of a carrier or an enrollee;
(b) The price charged for a specific prescription drug or class of drugs; or
(c) The amount of any rebate  or fee provided for a specific prescription drug or class of pre-
scription drugs.
(4) Information submitted to the department under this section is confidential and not  subject
to disclosure except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and ORS 705.137.
(5) Not later than October 1 of each calendar  year, the department shall publish on the
department’s website the aggregated data from all reports  filed by pharmacy benefit managers under
this section for the preceding calendar year. The department  shall publish the data in a manner that
does not disclose confidential information of pharmacy benefit managers.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 735.540 is amended to read:
735.540. As used in ORS 735.540 to 735.552:
(1) “Audit” means an on-site or remote review of  the records of a pharmacy , or a request for
records from a pharmacy for the purpose of an audit,  by or on behalf of an entity.
(2) “Clerical error” means a minor error:
(a) In the keeping, recording or transcribing of records  or documents or in the handling of
electronic or hard copies of correspondence;
(b) That does not result in financial harm to an entity; and
(c) That does not involve dispensing an incorrect dose, amount or type of  medication or dis-
pensing a prescription drug to the wrong person.
(3) “Entity” includes:
(a) A pharmacy benefit manager;
(b) An insurer;
(c) A third party administrator;
(d) A state agency; or
(e) A person that represents or is employed by one of the entities described in this subsection.
(4) “Fraud” means knowingly and willfully executing or attempting to  execute a scheme, in
connection  with  the delivery of or payment for health care benefits, items or services, that uses false
or misleading pretenses, representations or promises to obtain  any money or property owned by or
under the custody or control of any person.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 735.542 is amended to read:
735.542. An entity that audits claims or an independent  third party that contracts with an entity
to audit claims:
(1) Must establish, in writing, a procedure for  a pharmacy to appeal the entity’s findings with
respect to a claim  and must provide a pharmacy with a notice regarding the procedure, in writing
or electronically, prior to conducting an audit of the pharmacy’s claims;
(2) Must submit requests for records from a pharmacy for the purpose of an audit by:
(a) Electronic mail; and
(b) Facsimile or certified mail;
[(2)] (3) May not conduct an audit of a claim more than [ 24] 12 months after the date the claim
was adjudicated by the entity;
[(3)] (4)  Must give at least  15 days’ advance written notice of an on-site audit to the pharmacy
or corporate headquarters of the pharmacy  by electronic mail ;
[(4)] (5)  May not conduct an  on-site audit during the first five days of any month without the
pharmacy’s consent;
[(5)] (6)  Must conduct the audit in consultation with  a pharmacist who is licensed by this or
another state if the audit involves clinical or professional judgment;
[(6)] (7)(a)  May not [ conduct an on-site ] audit , [ of more than 250 unique prescriptions of a phar-
macy] in any 12-month period [ except in cases of alleged fraud; ], more than:
(A) 250 unique prescriptions during an on-site audit; or
(B) 250 unique prescriptions through a remote audit.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 7
(b) The  limits on the number of drugs that may be audited described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection do not include an audit conducted by a pharmacy benefit manager resulting
from a reasonable suspicion by the pharmacy benefit manager of fraud, waste or abuse sup-
ported by preliminary evidence that the pharmacy benefit  manager produces for the phar-
macy.
[(7)] (8) May not conduct more than one on-site audit of a pharmacy in any 12-month period;
(9) Must give a pharmacy at least 30 days to respond to an audit;
[(8)] (10)  Must audit each pharmacy under the same standards and  parameters that the entity
uses to audit other similarly situated pharmacies;
[(9)] (11) Must pay any outstanding claims of a pharmacy no more than 45 days after  the earlier
of the date all appeals are concluded or the date a final report is issued under ORS 735.550 (3);
[(10)] (12)  May not include dispensing fees or interest in the amount of any overpayment as-
sessed on a claim unless the overpaid claim was for a prescription that was not filled correctly;
[(11)] (13) May not recoup costs associated with:
(a) Clerical errors; or
(b) Other errors that do not result in financial harm to the entity or a consumer; and
[(12)] (14)  May not charge a pharmacy for a denied or disputed claim until the audit and the
appeals procedure established under subsection (1) of this section are final.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 743A.062 is amended to read:
743A.062. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Medical assistance program” means the state program  that provides medical assistance as
defined in ORS 414.025.
(b) “340B  drug” means a covered drug dispensed by a covered entity, as those terms are
defined in 42 U.S.C. 256b, that is subject to the cap on amounts required  to be paid in 42
U.S.C. 256b(a)(1).
(2) [ An insurance policy or ] A policy or certificate of health  insurance or other  contract
providing [ coverage for ] for the reimbursement of the cost of  a prescription drug to a resident
of this state may not:
(a) Exclude coverage of the  drug for a particular indication solely on the grounds that the in-
dication has not been  approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration if the Health
Evidence Review Commission established under ORS 414.688 or the Pharmacy  and Therapeutics
Committee established under ORS 414.353 determines that the drug is  recognized as effective for the
treatment of that indication:
(A) In publications that the commission or the committee determines to be equivalent to:
(i) The American Hospital Formulary Service drug information;
(ii) “Drug Facts and Comparisons” (Lippincott-Raven Publishers);
(iii) The United States Pharmacopoeia drug information; or
(iv) Other publications that have been identified by the United States Secretary of  Health and
Human Services as authoritative;
(B) In the majority of relevant peer-reviewed medical literature; or
(C) By the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services; [ or]
(b) For an insured who is enrolled in the medical assistance program:
(A) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this  section, require a prescription for the drug to
be filled or refilled at a mail order pharmacy; or
(B) Require a prescription for the drug to be filled or refilled at a pharmacy that is not a  local
pharmacy enrolled in the medical assistance program[ .];
(c) Discriminate in the reimbursement of a prescription for 340B drugs  from other pre-
scription drugs;
(d) Assess a fee, chargeback, clawback or other  adjustment for the dispensing of a 340B
drug;
(e) Exclude a pharmacy  from a pharmacy network on the basis that the pharmacy dis-
penses a 340B drug;
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 8
(f) Restrict the methods by which a 340B drug may be dispensed or delivered; or
(g) Restrict the number of pharmacies within a pharmacy network that may  dispense or
deliver 340B drugs.
(3) Subsection (2)(b)(A) of this section does not prohibit an  insurer from requiring a medical
assistance recipient to fill or refill a prescription for a specialty drug at a mail  order pharmacy that
is a specialty pharmacy.
(4) Required coverage of a prescription drug under this section  shall include coverage for med-
ically necessary services associated with the administration of that drug.
(5) Nothing in this section requires coverage for any prescription  drug if the United States Food
and Drug Administration has determined use of the drug to be contraindicated.
(6) Nothing in this section requires coverage  for experimental drugs not approved for any indi-
cation by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 750.055  (1)(h), this section does not apply to a health mainte-
nance organization as defined in ORS 750.005.
[(7)] (8) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 646A.694 is amended to read:
646A.694. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall provide to the Pre-
scription Drug Affordability Board each calendar quarter a list of prescription  drugs included in
reports submitted to the department under ORS 646A.689 (2) and  (6), a list of drugs included in re-
ports submitted to the department under ORS 646A.683 and 743.025 and a list of insulin  drugs mar-
keted in this  state during the previous calendar year. Each calendar year, the board shall identify
nine drugs and at least  one insulin product from the lists provided under this subsection that the
board determines may create affordability  challenges for health care systems or high out-of-pocket
costs for patients in this  state based on criteria adopted by the board by rule, including but not
limited to:
(a) Whether the prescription drug has led to health inequities in communities of color;
(b) The number of residents in this state prescribed the prescription drug;
(c) The price for the prescription drug sold in this state;
(d) The estimated average  monetary price concession, discount or rebate the manufacturer pro-
vides to health insurance plans in this state  or is expected to provide to health insurance plans in
this state, expressed as a percentage of the price for the prescription drug under review;
(e) The estimated total amount of the price concession, discount or  rebate the manufacturer
provides to each pharmacy benefit manager [ registered ] licensed in this state  for the prescription
drug under review, expressed as a percentage of the prices;
(f) The estimated price for therapeutic alternatives to the drug that are sold in this state;
(g) The estimated average price concession,  discount or rebate the manufacturer provides or is
expected to provide to health insurance plans and pharmacy benefit managers in this  state for
therapeutic alternatives;
(h) The estimated costs to health insurance plans based on patient use of the drug consistent
with the labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and recognized
standard medical practice;
(i) The impact on patient access to the drug considering standard  prescription drug benefit de-
signs in health insurance plans offered in this state;
(j) The  relative financial impacts to health, medical or social services costs as can be quantified
and compared to the costs of existing therapeutic alternatives;
(k) The estimated average patient copayment  or other cost-sharing for the prescription drug in
this state;
(L) Any information a manufacturer chooses to provide; and
(m) Any other factors as determined by the board in rules adopted by the board.
(2) A drug that is designated by the Secretary of the United States Food and  Drug Adminis-
tration, under 21 U.S.C. 360bb, as a drug for a rare disease or condition is  not subject to review
under subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 9
(3) The board  shall accept testimony from patients and caregivers affected by a condition or
disease that is treated by a prescription drug under review by  the board and from individuals with
scientific or medical training with respect to the disease or condition.
(4)(a) If the board considers the cost-effectiveness of a prescription drug in  criteria adopted by
the board under subsection (1) of  this section, the board may not use quality-adjusted life-years, or
similar formulas that take into account a patient’s age or severity of illness or disability, to identify
subpopulations for which a prescription drug would be  less cost-effective. For any prescription drug
that extends life, the board’s analysis of cost-effectiveness must weigh  the value of the quality of life
equally for all patients, regardless of the patients’ age or severity of illness or disability.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Health utility” means a measure of the degree to which having a particular  form of disease
or disability or having particular functional limitations negatively  impacts the quality of life as
compared to a state of perfect health, expressed as a number between zero and one.
(B) “Quality-adjusted life-year” is the product of a health utility multiplied by the  extra months
or years of life that a patient might gain as a result of a treatment.
(5) To the extent practicable, the board shall access pricing information for prescription drugs
by:
(a) Accessing pricing information collected by the department under ORS 646A.689  and 743.025;
(b) Accessing data reported to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 442.373;
(c) Entering into a memorandum of understanding  with another state to which manufacturers
already report pricing information; and
(d) Accessing other publicly available pricing information.
(6) The information used to conduct an affordability review may include any document and  re-
search related to the introductory price or price increase of a prescription drug, including life  cycle
management, net average price in this state, market competition and context, projected  revenue and
the estimated value or cost-effectiveness of the prescription drug.
(7) The department and the board shall  keep strictly confidential any information collected, used
or relied upon for the review conducted under this section if the information is:
(a) Information submitted to the department by a manufacturer under ORS 646A.689; and
(b) Confidential, proprietary or a trade secret as defined in ORS 192.345.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 192.355 is amended to read:
192.355. The following public records are exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478:
(1) Communications within a public body or between public bodies of an advisory nature to the
extent that they cover other than purely factual materials  and are preliminary to any final agency
determination of policy or action. This exemption shall not apply unless the  public body shows that
in the particular instance the public interest in encouraging frank communication  between officials
and employees of public bodies clearly outweighs the public interest in disclosure.
(2)(a) Information of a personal nature such as but not  limited to that kept in a personal, med-
ical or similar file, if public disclosure would  constitute an unreasonable invasion of privacy, unless
the public interest by clear  and convincing evidence requires disclosure in the particular instance.
The party seeking disclosure shall have the burden of showing that public disclosure would not
constitute an unreasonable invasion of privacy.
(b) Images of a dead  body, or parts of a dead body, that are part of a law enforcement agency
investigation, if public disclosure would create an unreasonable invasion of privacy of the  family of
the deceased  person, unless the public interest by clear and convincing evidence requires disclosure
in the particular instance. The  party seeking disclosure shall have the burden of showing that public
disclosure would not constitute an unreasonable invasion of privacy.
(3) Upon compliance with ORS 192.363, public body employee or volunteer residential addresses,
residential telephone numbers, personal cellular telephone numbers, personal electronic mail  ad-
dresses, driver license numbers, employer-issued identification card numbers,  emergency contact in-
formation, Social Security numbers, dates of birth  and other telephone numbers contained in
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 10
personnel records maintained by the public body that  is the employer or the recipient of volunteer
services. This exemption:
(a) Does not apply to the addresses, dates of birth and  telephone numbers of employees or vol-
unteers who are elected officials, except that a judge or district attorney subject to  election may
seek to exempt the  judge’s or district attorney’s address or telephone number, or both, under the
terms of ORS 192.368;
(b) Does not  apply to employees or volunteers to the extent that the party seeking disclosure
shows by clear and convincing evidence that the public  interest requires disclosure in a particular
instance pursuant to ORS 192.363;
(c) Does not apply  to a substitute teacher as defined in ORS 342.815 when requested by a pro-
fessional education association of which the substitute teacher may be a member; and
(d) Does not relieve a public employer of any duty under ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(4) Information submitted  to a public body in confidence and not otherwise required by law to
be submitted, where such information should reasonably be considered confidential, the public  body
has obliged itself in good faith  not to disclose the information, and when the public interest would
suffer by the disclosure.
(5) Information or records of the Department of Corrections,  including the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision, to the extent that disclosure would interfere with the rehabilitation  of
a person  in custody of the department or substantially prejudice or prevent the carrying out of the
functions of the department, if  the public interest in confidentiality clearly outweighs the public
interest in disclosure.
(6) Records, reports and other information received or compiled by the Director  of the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services in the administration of ORS chapters 723  and 725 not
otherwise required by law  to be made public, to the extent that the interests of lending institutions,
their officers, employees and  customers in preserving the confidentiality of such information out-
weighs the public interest in disclosure.
(7) Reports made to or filed with the court under ORS 137.077 or 137.530.
(8) Any public records or  information the disclosure of which is prohibited by federal law or
regulations.
(9)(a) Public  records or information the disclosure of which is prohibited or restricted or other-
wise made confidential or privileged under Oregon law.
(b) Subject  to ORS 192.360, paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to factual information
compiled in a public record when:
(A) The basis for the claim of exemption is ORS 40.225;
(B) The factual information is not prohibited from disclosure  under any applicable state or fed-
eral law, regulation or  court order and is not otherwise exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311
to 192.478;
(C) The factual information was compiled by or at the  direction of an attorney as part of an
investigation on behalf  of the public body in response to information of possible wrongdoing by the
public body;
(D) The factual  information was not compiled in preparation for litigation, arbitration or an
administrative proceeding that was reasonably  likely to be initiated or that has been initiated by
or against the public body; and
(E) The holder of the privilege under ORS 40.225 has made or authorized a public statement
characterizing or partially  disclosing the factual information compiled by or at the attorney’s di-
rection.
(10) Public records or information described  in this section, furnished by the public body ori-
ginally compiling, preparing or  receiving them to any other public officer or public body in con-
nection with performance of the duties of the recipient, if the considerations  originally giving rise
to the confidential or exempt nature of the public records or information remain applicable.
(11) Records of the Energy Facility Siting Council concerning  the review or approval of security
programs pursuant to ORS 469.530.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 11
(12) Employee and retiree  address, telephone number and other nonfinancial membership records
and employee financial records maintained by the Public Employees Retirement System  pursuant to
ORS chapters 238 and 238A or by another retirement system operated by a public body.
(13) Records of or submitted to the State Treasurer, the Oregon Investment Council  or the
agents of the treasurer or the council relating to active or proposed publicly traded investments
under ORS chapter 293, including but not limited to records regarding the acquisition, exchange or
liquidation of the investments. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) The exemption does not apply to:
(A) Information  in investment records solely related to the amount paid directly into an invest-
ment by, or returned from the investment directly to, the treasurer or council; or
(B) The identity of the entity to which the amount was paid directly or from which the  amount
was received directly.
(b) An investment in a publicly traded investment is no longer active when acquisition, exchange
or liquidation of the investment has been concluded.
(14)(a) Records of or submitted to the State Treasurer, the Oregon Investment  Council, the
Oregon Growth Board or  the agents of the treasurer, council or board relating to actual or proposed
investments under ORS  chapter 293 or 348 in a privately placed investment fund or a private asset
including but not limited to records regarding the  solicitation, acquisition, deployment, exchange or
liquidation of the investments including but not limited to:
(A) Due diligence materials that are proprietary to  an investment fund, to an asset ownership
or to their respective investment vehicles.
(B) Financial statements of an investment fund, an asset ownership or their respective  invest-
ment vehicles.
(C) Meeting materials of an investment fund, an asset ownership or their respective investment
vehicles.
(D) Records containing information regarding the portfolio  positions in which an investment
fund, an asset ownership or their respective investment vehicles invest.
(E) Capital call and distribution notices of an investment fund, an asset ownership or their  re-
spective investment vehicles.
(F) Investment agreements and related documents.
(b) The exemption under this subsection does not apply to:
(A) The name, address and vintage year of each privately placed investment fund.
(B) The dollar amount of  the commitment made to each privately placed investment fund since
inception of the fund.
(C) The dollar  amount of cash contributions made to each privately placed investment fund since
inception of the fund.
(D) The dollar amount, on a fiscal year-end basis, of cash distributions  received by the State
Treasurer, the Oregon Investment Council, the Oregon Growth  Board or the agents of the treasurer,
council or board from each privately placed investment fund.
(E) The  dollar amount, on a fiscal year-end basis, of the remaining value of assets in a privately
placed investment fund attributable to an investment by the State  Treasurer, the Oregon Investment
Council, the Oregon Growth Board or the agents of the treasurer, council or board.
(F) The net internal rate of return of each privately placed investment fund since  inception of
the fund.
(G) The investment multiple of each privately placed investment fund since inception of the fund.
(H) The dollar amount  of the total management fees and costs paid on an annual fiscal year-end
basis to each privately placed investment fund.
(I) The dollar amount of cash profit received  from each privately placed investment fund on a
fiscal year-end basis.
(15) The  monthly reports prepared and submitted under ORS 293.761 and 293.766 concerning the
Public Employees Retirement Fund  and the Industrial Accident Fund may be uniformly treated as
exempt from disclosure for a period of up to 90 days after the end of the calendar quarter.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 12
(16) Reports of unclaimed property filed by  the holders of such property to the extent permitted
by ORS 98.352.
(17)(a) The following records, communications  and information submitted to the Oregon Business
Development Commission, the Oregon Business Development Department, the  State Department of
Agriculture, the Oregon Growth Board, the Port of Portland or  other ports as defined in ORS
777.005, or a county or city governing body and any  board, department, commission, council or
agency thereof, by applicants for investment funds, grants, loans, services  or economic development
moneys, support or assistance including, but not limited to, those described in ORS 285A.224:
(A) Personal financial statements.
(B) Financial statements of applicants.
(C) Customer lists.
(D) Information of an applicant pertaining  to litigation to which the applicant is a party if the
complaint has been filed, or if the complaint has not been  filed, if the applicant shows that such
litigation is reasonably likely to occur; this exemption does not apply to litigation which has  been
concluded, and nothing in this subparagraph shall limit any right or opportunity granted by discov-
ery or deposition statutes to a party to litigation or potential litigation.
(E) Production, sales and cost data.
(F) Marketing strategy information that  relates to applicant’s plan to address specific markets
and applicant’s strategy regarding specific competitors.
(b) The following  records, communications and information submitted to the State Department
of Energy by applicants for tax credits or for grants awarded under ORS 469B.256:
(A) Personal financial statements.
(B) Financial statements of applicants.
(C) Customer lists.
(D) Information of an applicant pertaining to litigation to which the applicant  is a party if the
complaint has been filed, or if the complaint  has not been filed, if the applicant shows that such
litigation  is  reasonably likely to occur; this exemption does not apply to litigation which has been
concluded, and nothing in this subparagraph shall limit any right or opportunity granted by discov-
ery or deposition statutes to a party to litigation or potential litigation.
(E) Production, sales and cost data.
(F) Marketing strategy information that relates to applicant’s plan  to address specific markets
and applicant’s strategy regarding specific competitors.
(18) Records,  reports or returns submitted by private concerns or enterprises required by law
to be submitted to or inspected by a governmental body to allow it to determine  the amount of any
transient lodging tax payable and the amounts of such tax payable or paid, to  the extent that such
information is in a  form which would permit identification of the individual concern or enterprise.
Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use  which can be made of such information for regulatory
purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceedings. The public body  shall notify the tax-
payer of the delinquency immediately by certified mail. However, in  the event that the payment or
delivery of transient lodging taxes otherwise due to a public body is delinquent by over 60 days,  the
public body shall disclose, upon the request of any person, the following information:
(a) The identity of the individual  concern or enterprise that is delinquent over 60 days in the
payment or delivery of the taxes.
(b) The period for which the taxes are delinquent.
(c) The actual, or estimated, amount of the delinquency.
(19) All information supplied by a person under  ORS 151.485 for the purpose of requesting ap-
pointed counsel, and all information supplied  to the court from whatever source for the purpose of
verifying the financial eligibility of a person pursuant to ORS 151.485.
(20) Workers’ compensation claim records of the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, except in accordance with rules adopted by the Director of the Department of  Consumer and
Business Services, in any of the following circumstances:
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 13
(a) When necessary for insurers, self-insured employers  and third party claim administrators to
process workers’ compensation claims.
(b) When necessary for the director, other governmental agencies of this state or  the United
States to carry out their duties, functions or powers.
(c) When the disclosure is made in such a manner that the disclosed information cannot be  used
to identify any worker who is the subject of a claim.
(d) When a worker or the  worker’s representative requests review of the worker’s claim record.
(21) Sensitive business records or financial or commercial information of the Oregon Health and
Science University that is not customarily provided to business competitors.
(22) Records of Oregon Health and Science University regarding candidates for the position of
president of the university.
(23) The records of a library, including:
(a) Circulation records, showing use of specific library material by a named person;
(b) The name of a library patron together with the  address or telephone number of the patron;
and
(c) The electronic mail address of a patron.
(24) The following records, communications and  information obtained by the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department  in connection with the department’s monitoring or administration of
financial assistance or of housing or other developments:
(a) Personal and corporate financial statements and information, including tax returns.
(b) Credit reports.
(c) Project appraisals, excluding appraisals obtained in the course of transactions involving  an
interest in real estate that is acquired, leased, rented,  exchanged, transferred or otherwise disposed
of as part of the project, but only after the transactions have closed and are concluded.
(d) Market studies and analyses.
(e) Articles of incorporation, partnership agreements and operating agreements.
(f) Commitment letters.
(g) Project pro forma statements.
(h) Project cost certifications and cost data.
(i) Audits.
(j) Project tenant correspondence.
(k) Personal information about a tenant.
(L) Housing assistance payments.
(25) Raster geographic information  system (GIS) digital databases, provided by private forestland
owners or their representatives, voluntarily and  in confidence to the State Forestry Department,
that is not otherwise required by law to be submitted.
(26) Sensitive  business, commercial or financial information furnished to or developed by a
public body engaged in the  business of providing electricity or electricity services, if the information
is directly related to a transaction described in ORS 261.348, or  if the information is directly related
to a bid, proposal  or negotiations for the sale or purchase of electricity or electricity services, and
disclosure of the information would cause a competitive  disadvantage for the public body or its re-
tail electricity customers. This subsection does not apply to cost-of-service studies used in  the de-
velopment or review of generally applicable rate schedules.
(27) Sensitive business, commercial or financial information  furnished to or developed by the
City of Klamath Falls,  acting solely in connection with the ownership and operation of the Klamath
Cogeneration Project, if  the information is directly related to a transaction described in ORS 225.085
and disclosure of the information would cause a competitive disadvantage for the Klamath
Cogeneration Project. This subsection does not apply  to cost-of-service studies used in the develop-
ment or review of generally applicable rate schedules.
(28) Personally identifiable information about customers of a municipal  electric utility or a
people’s utility district or the names, dates of birth, driver  license numbers, telephone numbers,
electronic mail addresses or Social Security numbers of  customers who receive water, sewer or
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 14
storm drain services from a public body  as defined in ORS 174.109. The utility or district may re-
lease personally identifiable information about a customer, and  a public body providing water, sewer
or storm drain services may release  the name, date of birth, driver license number, telephone num-
ber, electronic mail address or Social Security number of a customer, if the customer consents in
writing or electronically, if the disclosure  is necessary for the utility, district or other public body
to render services to the customer,  if the disclosure is required pursuant to a court order or if the
disclosure is otherwise required by federal or state law. The utility,  district or other public body
may charge as appropriate for the costs of providing such information. The utility,  district or other
public body may make customer records available  to third party credit agencies on a regular basis
in connection with the establishment and management of customer accounts or  in the event such
accounts are delinquent.
(29) A record of the street  and number of an employee’s address submitted to a special district
to obtain assistance in promoting an alternative to single occupant motor vehicle transportation.
(30) Sensitive business records, capital development plans or financial or commercial information
of Oregon Corrections Enterprises that is not customarily provided to business competitors.
(31) Documents, materials or other  information submitted to the Director of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services in confidence by a state, federal, foreign or international  regula-
tory or law enforcement agency or by the National Association  of Insurance Commissioners, its af-
filiates or subsidiaries under ORS 86A.095 to 86A.198, 697.005 to 697.095, 697.602 to 697.842, 705.137,
717.200 to 717.320, 717.900 or 717.905, ORS chapter 59, 723, 725 or 726, the Bank  Act or the Insur-
ance Code when:
(a) The document, material or other information is received upon  notice or with an under-
standing that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of
the document, material or other information; and
(b) The director has obligated the Department of  Consumer and Business Services not to dis-
close the document, material or other information.
(32) A county elections security plan developed and filed under ORS 254.074.
(33) Information about review or approval of programs relating to the security of:
(a) Generation, storage or conveyance of:
(A) Electricity;
(B) Gas in liquefied or gaseous form;
(C) Hazardous substances as defined in ORS 453.005 (7)(a), (b) and (d);
(D) Petroleum products;
(E) Sewage; or
(F) Water.
(b) Telecommunication systems, including cellular, wireless or radio systems.
(c) Data transmissions by whatever means provided.
(34) The information  specified in ORS 25.020 (8) if the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court des-
ignates the information as confidential by rule under ORS 1.002.
(35)(a) Employer account records of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(b) As used in this subsection, “employer account records”  means all records maintained in any
form that are specifically related to the account of any employer insured, previously insured or un-
der consideration  to be insured by the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation and any infor-
mation obtained or developed by the corporation  in connection with providing, offering to provide
or declining to provide insurance to a specific employer.  “Employer account records” includes, but
is not limited to, an employer’s payroll records, premium payment history, payroll classifications,
employee names and identification information, experience modification factors, loss  experience and
dividend payment history.
(c) The exemption provided by this subsection may not serve as  the basis for opposition to the
discovery documents in litigation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure.
(36)(a) Claimant files of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 15
(b) As used in this subsection, “claimant files” includes,  but is not limited to, all records held
by the corporation pertaining to a person who has made  a claim, as defined in ORS 656.005, and all
records pertaining to such a claim.
(c) The exemption provided by this subsection may not serve as  the basis for opposition to the
discovery documents in litigation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure.
(37) Except as  authorized by ORS 408.425, records that certify or verify an individual’s discharge
or other separation from military service.
(38) Records of or submitted to a domestic violence service or resource center that  relate to the
name or personal information of an individual who visits a center for service, including the date  of
service, the type of service received, referrals  or contact information or personal information of a
family member of the individual. As used in this subsection, “domestic violence  service or resource
center” means an entity, the primary purpose of which is  to assist persons affected by domestic or
sexual violence by providing  referrals, resource information or other assistance specifically of ben-
efit to domestic or sexual violence victims.
(39) Information reported to the Oregon Health Authority  under ORS 431A.860, except as pro-
vided in ORS  431A.865 (3)(b), information disclosed by the authority under ORS 431A.865 and any
information  related  to disclosures made by the authority under ORS 431A.865, including information
identifying the recipient of the information.
(40)(a) Electronic mail  addresses in the possession or custody of an agency or subdivision of the
executive department, as  defined in ORS 174.112, the legislative department, as defined in ORS
174.114, a local government or local service district, as defined  in ORS 174.116, or a special gov-
ernment body, as defined in ORS 174.117.
(b) This subsection does not  apply to electronic mail addresses assigned by a public body to
public employees for use by the employees in the ordinary course of their employment.
(c) This subsection and ORS 244.040 do not prohibit the campaign office of the  current
officeholder or current candidates who  have filed to run for that elective office from receiving upon
request the electronic mail  addresses used by the current officeholder’s legislative office for news-
letter distribution, except that a campaign office that  receives electronic mail addresses under this
paragraph may not make a further disclosure of  those electronic mail addresses to any other person.
(41) Residential addresses, residential telephone  numbers, personal cellular telephone numbers,
personal electronic mail addresses,  driver license numbers, emergency contact information, Social
Security numbers, dates of birth and other  telephone numbers of individuals currently or previously
certified or licensed by the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training contained in the
records maintained by the department.
(42) Personally identifiable information  and contact information of veterans as defined in ORS
408.225 and of persons serving on active duty or as reserve members with the Armed Forces of the
United States, National Guard or other reserve component that was obtained by the Department  of
Veterans’ Affairs in the course  of performing its duties and functions, including but not limited to
names, residential and employment addresses, dates  of birth, driver license numbers, telephone
numbers, electronic mail addresses,  Social Security numbers, marital status, dependents, the char-
acter  of  discharge from military service, military rating or rank, that the person is a veteran or has
provided military service, information relating to  an application for or receipt of federal or state
benefits, information relating to the basis for receipt or denial of federal or state benefits  and in-
formation relating to a home loan or grant  application, including but not limited to financial infor-
mation provided in connection with the application.
(43) Business, commercial, financial, operational and research data and  information, including
but not limited to pricing, intellectual property and customer records,  furnished to, developed by or
generated in connection with the ownership and operation of an unmanned aerial system test  range,
if disclosure of the information would cause a competitive disadvantage to the  test range or its us-
ers.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 16
(44) Personally identifiable information about a child under the age  of 16 years that is submitted
to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission or an agent of the commission to obtain a license,  tag
or permit under the wildlife laws.
(45) Proprietary information subject to a nondisclosure agreement that is provided to the Oregon
Broadband Office pursuant to ORS 285A.176.
(46) With respect to records held by the  State Treasurer relating to unclaimed properties under
ORS 98.302 to 98.436:
(a) All materials or communications received during  an examination under ORS 98.412 (2) and
(3), except to  the extent that the information in the materials or communications appears within a
report under ORS 98.412 (4) or 98.352 and  the information is not otherwise exempt under ORS 98.352
(4).
(b) All materials or communications assembled or used by the  state or its auditor during the
preparation of a report under ORS 98.412 (4), including drafts, correspondence,  working papers and
other preparatory documents.
(c) Information obtained during  an examination under ORS 98.412 (2) and (3) concerning an un-
claimed property holder’s potential liability in a state other  than Oregon, even if that information
is included in a report under ORS 98.412 (4) or 98.352.
(d) Information in or supporting claims to unclaimed property under ORS 98.392, except to  the
extent that the claimant consents to the information’s disclosure.
(47) Any document, record or plan for protection relating to  the existence, nature, location or
function of cybersecurity devices, programs or systems designed to protect computer,  information
technology or communications systems against threat or attack, including but not limited to:
(a) Records pertaining to devices, programs or systems that depend  for their effectiveness in
whole or part upon a lack of public knowledge; and
(b) Contractual records or insurance records that set forth cybersecurity specifications, insur-
ance application and coverage details.
(48) Sensitive  business, commercial or financial information, that is not customarily
provided to business competitors, that is furnished to or developed by  the Oregon Pre-
scription Drug Program in connection with purchasing prescription drugs  or contracting for
the services of a  pharmacy benefit manager or pharmacy networks pursuant to ORS 414.312.
SECTION 14. No later than January 1, 2025, the Department of Consumer and  Business
Services shall hire at least one additional full-time employee to assist in  the regulation of
pharmacy benefit managers under ORS 735.530 to 735.552.
SECTION 15. The amendments to ORS 735.534, 735.536,  735.540 and 735.542 by sections 6,
7, 9 and 10 of this 2024 Act apply  to contracts between pharmacies and pharmacy benefit
managers that are entered into, renewed,  extended or automatically renewed on or after
January 1, 2025.
SECTION 16. (1) Section 2 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS  646A.694, 735.530,
735.532, 735.533, 735.534, 735.536, 735.537, 735.540, 735.542  and 743A.062 by sections 3 to 12 of
this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall take all steps necessary
before January 1, 2025, to carry  out the amendments to ORS 735.532 and 735.533 by sections
4 and 5 of this 2024 Act on and after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$697,364 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Consumer and Business Services for the purpose of carrying out sections 2 and  14 of this
2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 646A.694, 735.530, 735.532, 735.533,  735.534, 735.536,
735.537, 735.540, 735.542 and 743A.062 by sections 3 to 12 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 18. Section 14 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 17
SECTION 19. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4149 (HB 4149-B) Page 18